Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.800

Olympic natural resources center—Finding, intent.

The legislature finds that conflicts over the use of natural resources essential to the state's residents, especially forest and ocean resources, have increased dramatically. There are growing demands that these resources be fully utilized for their commodity values, while simultaneously there are increased demands for protection and preservation of these same resources. While these competing demands are most often viewed as mutually exclusive, recent research has suggested that commodity production and ecological values can be integrated. It is the intent of the legislature to foster and support the research and education necessary to provide sound scientific information on which to base sustainable forest and marine industries, and at the same time sustain the ecological values demanded by much of the public.

[ 1991 c 316 s 1. Formerly RCW 76.12.205.]

NOTES:

Severability—1991 c 316: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1991 c 316 s 6.]